Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-138
National Guard; officers; selection; separation.

The system of selecting and separating officers of the Nebraska National Guard will be prescribed in regulations issued by the Department of the Army or Department of the Air Force.

Laws 1917, c. 205, § 15, p. 488;

Laws 1919, c. 121, § 3, p. 291;

C.S.1922, § 3319;

C.S.1929, § 55-139;

R.S.1943, § 55-117;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 9, p. 596;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-117;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 36, p. 1594;

Laws 1978, LB 570, § 3.